Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-503.01
Summons.

(1) The summons shall be directed to the defendant or defendants, and contain the names of the parties and the name and address of the plaintiff's attorney, if any, otherwise the address of the plaintiff. It shall notify defendant that in order to defend the lawsuit an appropriate written response shall be filed with the court within thirty days after service, and that upon failure to do so the court may enter judgment for the relief demanded in the complaint.

(2) A judgment by default shall not be different in kind from that demanded in the complaint. If only special damages are demanded a judgment by default shall not exceed the amount demanded in the complaint.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 20;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 13.

Workers' compensation cases, court issues summons, see sections 48-174 and 48-190.